Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-2701.55
Admission, defined.

(1) Admission
means the right or privilege to have access to a place or location where amusement,
entertainment, or recreation is provided to an audience, spectators, or the
participants in the activity. Admission includes a membership that allows
access to or use of a place or location, but which membership does not include
the right to hold office, vote, or change the policies of the organization.

(2) For purposes
of this section:

(a) Access to a place or location means the right to be in the place
or location for purposes of amusement, entertainment, or recreation at a time
when the general public is not allowed at that place or location absent the
granting of the admission;

(b) Entertainment means the amusement or diversion provided to an
audience or spectators by performers; and

(c) Recreation means a sport or activity
engaged in by participants for purposes of refreshment, relaxation, or diversion
of the participants. Recreation does not include practice or instruction.

(3) Admission
does not include the lease or rental of a location, facility, or part of a
location or facility if the lessor cedes the right to determine who is granted
access to the location or facility to the lessee for the period of the lease
or rental.

Laws 2012, LB727, § 36.